Washington statutes.
RCW 39.04.151

Small works roster—State agencies, authorized local governments may establish—Municipal research and services center—Rules.

(1) A state agency or an authorized local government may utilize a statewide small works roster in accordance with subsection (2) of this section or create and maintain one or more small works rosters for different specialties, categories of anticipated work, or geographic areas served by contractors on the roster that have registered for inclusion on that particular roster.

(a) The small works roster shall consist of all responsible contractors who have requested to be on the list, and where required by law, are properly licensed or registered to perform such work in this state in accordance with RCW 39.04.350.

(b) A state agency or authorized local government establishing a small works roster must require contractors desiring to be placed on the roster to indicate if they meet the definition of women and minority-owned business as described in RCW 39.19.030(7)(b), veteran-owned business as defined in RCW 43.60A.010, or small business as defined in RCW 39.04.010, and to keep current records of any applicable licenses, certifications, registrations, bonding, insurance, or other appropriate matters on file with the appropriate agency as a condition of being placed on the roster and award of contract.

(c) At least once a year, the state agency or local government must publish in a newspaper of general circulation and provide the office of minority and women's business enterprises' directory of certified firms a notice of the existence of the roster and solicit contractors for the roster.

(d) Responsible contractors must be added to an appropriate roster at any time they submit a written request and the necessary records.

(e) The contractor must agree and be able to receive notifications and other communications via email.

(f) State agencies or authorized local governments using a small works roster may not break a project into units or construct a project by phases if done for the purposes of avoiding maximum dollar amounts set by chapter 395, Laws of 2023.

(2) The department of commerce though [through] the municipal research and services center shall develop a statewide small works roster in compliance with subsection (1) of this section by June 30, 2024. The municipal research and services center must develop criteria for the statewide roster with collaboration from affected state and local agencies. The statewide roster must have features to filter the roster by different specialties, categories of anticipated work, or geographic areas served by contractors. The roster must also indicate if the contractor is designated as a small business as defined in RCW 39.04.010.

(3) The department of commerce shall provide funding to the municipal research and services center as appropriated to maintain and publicize a small works roster and work with the municipal research and services center to notify state and local governments authorized to use small works rosters of the statewide roster authority and to provide guidance on how to use the authority. The guidance may take the form of a manual provided to local governments.

(4) A state agency establishing a small works roster shall adopt rules implementing this section. A local government establishing a small works roster shall adopt an ordinance or resolution implementing this section. Procedures included in rules adopted by the department of enterprise services in implementing this section must be included in any rules providing for a small works roster that is adopted by another state agency, if the authority for that state agency to engage in these activities has been delegated to it by the department of enterprise services under chapter 43.19 RCW. An interlocal contract or agreement between two or more state agencies or local governments establishing a small works roster to be used by the parties to the agreement or contract must clearly identify the lead entity that is responsible for implementing the provisions of this subsection.

[ 2023 c 395 s 14.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 395 ss 1-30, 32-34, 36, and 37: See note following RCW 39.04.010.

Findings—Intent—2023 c 395: See note following RCW 39.04.010.